Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-17] Election to take payment or
delivery. (a) The administrator may decline to receive property reported
under this part that the administrator considers to have a value less than the
expenses of notice and sale.

(b) A holder, with the written consent of the
administrator and upon conditions and terms prescribed by the administrator,
may report and deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned.
Property so delivered shall be held by the administrator and shall not be
presumed abandoned until it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under this part.
[L 2008, c 55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next